District of Columbia statutes.
8-702

Repealed

Contracts for collection and disposal of garbage and refuse.

Repealed.

May 18, 1910, 36 Stat. 389, ch. 248
Mar. 3, 1915, 38 Stat. 904, ch. 80
Apr. 6, 1978, D.C. Law 2-69, § 4, 24 DCR 6800
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(b), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-502.
1973 Ed., § 6-502.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.